Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. General Provisions

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 8, provides: “The repeal of any statutes by this act shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing before July 1, 2000, or any prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, every pending prosecution, suit, or action shall be proceeded in, tried, and determined in the circuit court which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the county court or which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the justice of the peace court.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 9, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], each circuit court shall consist of the county courts geographically located within a judicial district in existence on the effective date of this act. All judicial business pending before any county court shall be considered to be pending before the circuit court, and the circuit court judges shall in all respects be the judicial successors in office of all the county court judges and county courts of the county. All judicial files, records, and dockets belonging to or appertaining to the office of the county court judges and county courts of the counties shall be filed in the appropriate office of the circuit court and safely kept therein, or may be stored and shall in all respects constitute records of the circuit court.”

§ 5-9-101.
Definitions; construction of provisions.

As used in this act unless the context otherwise requires:

“Felony” means a criminal offense for which the penalty authorized by law includes imprisonment in a state penal institution for more than one (1) year;

“Misdemeanor” means a criminal offense which is not a felony.

When no special provision is otherwise made by law, the circuit court shall be vested with all inherent powers which are possessed by courts of record in this state.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.3; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-101

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cited

in

Jessen v. Burry, 13 P.3d 1118,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 2000); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 5-9-102.
Circuit court established; funding.

Pursuant to the provisions of section 10 of article 5 of the Wyoming Constitution, a circuit court is hereby established for each judicial district of the state of Wyoming enumerated in W.S.

5-3-101

, and the boundaries of each circuit court shall be the same as those of each judicial district enumerated therein. Except as otherwise provided in this act, each county within the circuit shall receive the services of the circuit court.

The judicial salaries, salaries of the clerical staff, supplies, operating costs, jury expenses and other expenses of the circuit court shall be paid by the state.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 6, provides: “A county having a justice of the peace court on August 1, 1999 which continuously maintained the court on and after that date until the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], shall continue to have that court on and after the effective date of this act. The county shall continue to pay all costs, expenses and salaries for the court as it did on August 1, 1999. Except as provided in W.S.

5-9-119

, a county which continues to have a justice of the peace court on and after the effective date of this act shall not receive the services of the circuit court established under W.S.

5-9-102

. On and after the effective date of this act, the board of county commissioners of the county by resolution may abolish the justice of the peace court in that county effective at the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace. Upon the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace, the county immediately and for all lawful purposes shall receive the services of the circuit court for the circuit within which the county lies.”

Constitutionality. —

Former § 5-5-103, which allowed legislature to deny full funding for county courts in counties having a population of less than 30,000 did not, on its face, violate the state constitution as special legislation. Board of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 941 P.2d 742,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1997).

Former 5-5-103 allowing the legislature to deny full funding for county courts in counties having populations of less than 30,000 violated the constitutional mandate for equal protection of the laws where there had been disparate treatment of counties having populations of less than 30,000. Board of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 941 P.2d 742,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 5-9-103.
Number and
location of judges.

The legislature shall from time to time authorize the number and location of circuit court judges.

The supreme court may, based on caseload studies, determine where within a circuit the circuit court judge shall reside.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.6; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-104

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2009, ch. 4, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

redesignated the existing provision as (a); and added (b).

Laws 2009, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2009.

§ 5-9-104.
Justice of peace courts supplanted and replaced. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.7; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-105

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; repealed by 2018 ch. 108, § 3, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 5-9-105.
Extending jurisdiction to try misdemeanors committed in violation
of city or town ordinances.

The governing body of
any city or town situate within a judicial district in which a circuit
court is established may petition the supreme court to extend the
jurisdiction of the circuit court to determine and try all persons
charged with violation of the ordinances of the city or town. The
contribution that the city or town will make toward the expenses of
the circuit court whose jurisdiction includes enforcing the ordinances
of the city or town shall be set and paid as provided by written contract
of the circuit judges and the governing board of the city or town
involved, with the approval of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.8; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-106

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to enforce obedience of ordinances with fines and penalties, see § 15-1-103(a)(xli).

§ 5-9-106.
Disposition
of money collected for violations of city or town ordinances; disposition
of fines and penalties under general state laws.

All money collected by
a judge of a circuit court for violations of ordinances of a city
or town shall be paid into the general fund of the city or town whose
ordinance was violated. The circuit court shall keep separate account
books of funds for ordinance violations as designated by the Wyoming
supreme court. All fines and penalties under the general laws of the
state shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the
public school fund of the county.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.9; Laws 1981, ch. 141, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-107

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit.”

§ 5-9-107.
Supreme court to adopt rules; establish fees and court costs; rules
of civil and criminal procedure to govern courts.

The Wyoming supreme court
is hereby vested with management and supervisory powers over the circuit
courts of the state of Wyoming, and shall, by rule of the supreme
court establish procedures and regulations for the effective and expeditious
administration of the business of the circuit courts and shall establish
fees and costs for those courts. The Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure
for Circuit Courts and the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for
Circuit Courts, as amended or supplemented from time to time, shall
govern circuit courts.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.10; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1987, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-108

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Applied

in

State v. Faltynowicz, 660 P.2d 368,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 5-9-108.
Name of court; presider.

The circuit court shall
be called the “Circuit Court of the
. . . . .
(Number of the Judicial District) Judicial District,
. . . . .
(Name of County) County, State of
Wyoming” which shall be a court of record. The circuit court shall
be presided over by a circuit judge.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.11; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-109

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Stated in

Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept.
30, 2015).

§ 5-9-109.
Term of judges.

The terms of circuit
court judges shall be four (4) years. Each judge selected under the
provisions of article 5, section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution shall serve for one (1) year after his appointment and
until the first Monday in January following the next general election
after the expiration of such year. He shall, at such general election,
stand for retention in office throughout the circuit as provided in article 5, section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.12; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-110

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions in Election Code, see §§

22-2-105

and

22-2-107

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 11, provides: “The county clerks shall not accept a filing for retention in the office of county court judge nor conduct an election for retention in the office of county court judge in the general election first occurring after the effective date of this act, or any elections thereafter.”

Applied

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 5-9-110.
Judges to be nonpartisan; nomination and appointment.

Judges of the circuit
court shall be nonpartisan, shall be nominated and appointed and retained
as provided by article 5, section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.13; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-111

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to primary elections, see §§

22-5-203

through

22-5-205

.

As to nomination of nonpartisan candidates, see §§

22-5-216

to

22-5-219

.

As to filling of vacancies in nomination, see §§

22-5-401

to

22-5-403

.

As to nonpartisan primary and election ballots, see §

22-6-123

et seq.

Applied

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Judicial Merit Retention in Wyoming: An Analysis and Some Suggestions for Reform,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1980).

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 5-9-111.
Qualifications for appointment.

To be eligible for appointment to the office of judge of a circuit court, a person shall be:

A qualified elector of the state; and

Authorized to practice law in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.14; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-112

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 5-9-112.
Appointment to fill vacancies in office.

Vacancies occurring in
the office of judge of a circuit court shall be filled as provided
by article 5, section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.17; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-115

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to filling vacancies, see §§

22-18-101

through

22-18-112

.

Cited

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 5-9-113.
Delivery of official records and papers to successor in office.

If the office of judge
of a circuit court becomes vacant by reason of death, removal from
office, or otherwise, the senior circuit court judge, or if there
is none, the clerk of the district court shall take charge of the
official records and papers of the judge and deliver them to the successor
in office of that judge.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.18; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-116

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-114.
Jurisdiction of successor is same as that of predecessor in office.

A judge of a circuit
court with whom the records of his predecessor have been deposited
has the same jurisdiction over all actions and proceedings entered
in such records as if they were originally commenced before him.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.19; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-117

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's Notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 18, related to bond for circuit court judge.

Laws 2011, ch. 57, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 5-9-116.
Salaries of judges; traveling expenses.

Circuit court judges
shall receive the annual salary provided by W.S. 5-1-110(a)(iii). When a new salary is effective for any judge of a circuit
court upon new appointment or the commencement of a new term, it shall
be effective for all judges of the circuit courts. In addition to
salary, the state shall reimburse a judge of a circuit court for those
traveling expenses actually incurred when the business of the circuit
court requires his attendance more than five (5) miles from the place
where he regularly holds court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.21; Laws 1977, ch. 154, § 1; 1978, ch. 45, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; 1985, ch. 218, § 1; 1990, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-119

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to travel expenses of county officers generally, see §§

18-3-110

.

Judge not prevented from receiving salary increase. —

It is only public officers in elective public office and public officers appointed to fill vacancies in elective public offices that are prohibited by art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const., from receiving an increase or decrease in salary during their term. Since a county judge is not an elected public official, nor is he appointed to an elective public office, he is not prevented from receiving the salary increase granted by the enactment of this section. County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1988).

And past due salaries payable. —

Article 3, § 35, Wyo. Const. does not make ineffective a peremptory writ of mandamus directing payment of the amount of past due salaries to county court judges on the ground that the legislature failed to appropriate funds for payment of these salaries, as constitutionally required. This section is effective to appropriate funds for payment. County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 5-9-117.
Oath.

Before assuming the duties
of his office, a judge of a circuit court shall take and subscribe
before a district judge or a clerk of a court of record the oath of
office prescribed by the constitution of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.22; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-120

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

§ 5-9-118.
Judge may be district court commissioner; private practice of law
prohibited; magistrate of circuit court permitted to practice law.

A judge of a circuit
court may be appointed to and hold the office of district court commissioner.
A judge of a circuit court shall devote full time to the office and
may not engage in the private practice of law. A magistrate of a circuit
court, who is otherwise authorized to practice law in Wyoming, may
engage in the private practice of law so long as that practice does
not conflict with his duties as magistrate of a circuit court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.23; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-121

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to district court commissioners generally, see §

5-3-301

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Conflicts of Interest in Wyoming,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 79 (2000).

§ 5-9-119.
Judges may
hold court for each other; expenses of judge holding court in another
circuit or district; disqualification of judge; change of venue prohibited;
assignment of retired judges.

The judges of the circuit courts may hold court for each other and shall do so when required by law. The expenses of any judge of a circuit court holding court in any circuit other than his own or in any district court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-3-112

, including travel expenses and his expenses while holding court, shall be charged to the contingent fund of the circuit court in whose circuit he is holding court or to the contingent fund of the district court in whose district he is holding court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-3-112

.

A party to any action in circuit court may disqualify a circuit judge as provided by rules adopted by the supreme court for disqualification. Upon disqualification, or inability for any reason to fulfill his duties, the circuit judge shall appoint another circuit judge from his own or a different circuit or a district judge from his own or a different district, or a magistrate from the county in which the case is to be tried if no other circuit judge is available, to try the action.

There shall be no change of venue for civil actions triable in circuit court.

Any retired circuit court judge of this state who is not practicing law may, with his consent and the consent of the chief justice, at the request of a circuit court judge be assigned to hear a case in a circuit court as otherwise authorized by law. During any period of assignment, a retired circuit court judge shall receive as compensation an amount equal to the current compensation of a judge of the court to which he is assigned. The compensation received by a retired circuit court judge during any period of assignment shall not affect the receipt of any retirement allowance of the retired circuit court judge during the period of assignment. Assignments of retired circuit court judges under this section shall only be made in a manner that does not jeopardize the qualified status of state retirement plans established by the Wyoming legislature. When called to serve, a retired circuit court judge shall receive the same per diem and travel allowance as allowed active circuit court judges. Per diem allowances and compensation shall be paid from the contingent fund of the court to which the retired judge is assigned.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.24; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; 1995, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-122

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2008, ch. 27, § 1; 2011, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

deleted “for justices of the peace and” following “may hold court for each other and” in the first sentence of (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 27, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 6, provides: “A county having a justice of the peace court on August 1, 1999 which continuously maintained the court on and after that date until the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], shall continue to have that court on and after the effective date of this act. The county shall continue to pay all costs, expenses and salaries for the court as it did on August 1, 1999. Except as provided in W.S.

5-9-119

, a county which continues to have a justice of the peace court on and after the effective date of this act shall not receive the services of the circuit court established under W.S.

5-9-102

. On and after the effective date of this act, the board of county commissioners of the county by resolution may abolish the justice of the peace court in that county effective at the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace. Upon the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace, the county immediately and for all lawful purposes shall receive the services of the circuit court for the circuit within which the county lies.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of judge as affecting validity of decision in which other nondisqualified judges participated, 29 ALR5th 722.

Disqualification of judge based on property ownership interest in litigation which consists of more than mere ownership of stock — state cases, 56 ALR5th 783.

Prior representation or activity as prosecuting attorney as disqualifying judge from sitting or acting in criminal case, 85 ALR5th 471.

Disqualification of judge for having decided different case against litigant — State cases, 85 ALR5th 547.

Laws governing judicial recusal or disqualification in state proceeding as violating federal or state constitution, 91 ALR5th 437.

Disqualification of judge under 28 USC § 455(b)(5)(iii), where judge or his or her spouse, or certain of their relatives, is known to have an interest that could be affected by the proceeding, 54 ALR Fed 855.

§ 5-9-120.
Judicial robe.

While holding court,
judges of a circuit court shall wear a black judicial robe.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.25; Laws 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-123

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-121.
Seal of court.

Each circuit court shall
have a seal. Each court shall use a seal having upon it the inscription:
“Circuit Court of the
. . . . .
(Number
of the Judicial District) Judicial District,
. . . . .
(Name of County) County, State of Wyoming”. The seal
of a circuit court shall be affixed by a stamp that reproduces legibly
under photographic processes. A judge of a circuit court shall affix
his seal to every jurat or certificate of his official acts without
additional fee.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.26; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-124

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-122.
Budget.

The supreme court shall submit one (1) budget for the operation of all circuit courts, itemized by circuit, to the legislature for appropriation for each biennial period using forms and following procedures provided by law for state agencies funded by legislative appropriation. The supreme court shall submit the circuit courts’ budget in the same manner as provided for the supreme court budget in W.S.

5-2-123

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.27; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1980, ch. 49, § 2; 1981, ch. 141, § 1; 1985, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-125

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2017 ch. 16, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence.

§ 5-9-123.
Clerical assistants.

A judge of a circuit
court may appoint clerical assistants as necessary for the efficient
operation of the court, within the limits of the approved budget.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.28; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-126

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-124.
County to provide quarters and equipment; state to furnish certain
property for judges.

The board of county commissioners
shall provide suitable quarters to house the circuit court and shall
provide necessary furniture and fixtures to enable it to function
in accordance with this act. Each judge shall be furnished by the
state of Wyoming, without charge, the American and Wyoming state flags,
the latest edition of the Wyoming Statutes, cumulative supplements
thereto and the latest Session Laws of Wyoming. All property furnished
to a judge shall remain the property of the governmental unit supplying
the same, and upon termination of a judge’s term of office, shall
be transmitted to his successor in office.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.29; Laws 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-127

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-125.
Court continuously in session.

The circuit court shall
be continuously in session.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.30; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-128

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-126.
Business hours; judge to be always available for criminal matters.

Circuit courts shall
be open for the transaction of business during regular business hours,
and in criminal matters a judge, magistrate or district court commissioner
shall be available at all times for fixing and accepting bail, issuing
warrants including search warrants, and conducting arraignment proceedings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.31; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-129

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-127.
Process extends throughout state.

The process of a circuit
court shall extend throughout the state.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.32; Laws 1985, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-130

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-128.
Civil jurisdiction.

Each circuit court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction within the boundaries of the state for:

An action where the prayer for recovery is an amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), exclusive of court costs;

Actions to recover specific personal property the value of which does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), exclusive of court costs and shall be prosecuted in accordance with W.S.

1-15-301

through

1-15-306

;

Actions to foreclose or enforce a lien on or security interest in personal property perfected under the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104, when the amount claimed on the lien or security interest does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), exclusive of court costs;

Actions for small claims as provided by W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

;

Actions for forcible entry or detainer as provided by W.S.

1-21-1001

through

1-21-1016

;

Actions to foreclose and enforce the following statutory liens only, when the amount claimed on the lien does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), exclusive of court costs:

Construction liens as provided by W.S.

29-2-101

through

29-2-113

;

Liens for labor and materials as provided by W.S.

29-4-101

and

29-4-102

;

Liens for labor and services as provided by W.S.

29-5-101

through

29-5-106

and

29-7-101

through

29-7-301

; and

Liens for taxes as provided by W.S. 39-15-108(d) and 39-16-108(d).

Actions to dispose of an abandoned vehicle as provided by W.S. 31-13-112(e), regardless of the value of the abandoned vehicle.

The circuit court may issue writs of attachment or garnishment as provided by W.S.

1-15-101

through

1-15-212

and

1-15-401

through

1-15-511

, and may issue judgment, execution and stay of execution, and order the sale of the property seized under execution as provided by W.S.

1-19-101

through

1-19-108

and

1-21-401

through

1-21-703

. A writ of execution issuing from a circuit court shall be in the form and subject to the provisions of W.S.

1-17-308

.

The judge may submit to arbitration any civil matter pending in circuit court, upon agreement of the parties as provided by W.S.

1-21-801

through

1-21-804

, or upon application of either party showing an arbitration agreement and refusal of the opposing party to arbitrate as provided by W.S.

1-36-101

through

1-36-119

.

The provisions of W.S.

5-1-107

pertaining to the exercise of personal jurisdiction apply in the circuit courts.

The circuit court shall have jurisdiction to enforce and make findings under the Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act, W.S.

2-3-1001

through

2-3-1017

. This jurisdiction shall include the authority to make necessary findings concerning compliance with federal law as required by the Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.33; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1980, ch. 26, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1985, ch. 10 § 1; ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 198, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1996, ch. 12, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-131

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2001, ch. 40, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2; 2011, ch. 176 § 1; ch. 196, § 1; 2016 ch. 39, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(vi)(C), substituted “through

29-7-301

” for “through

29-7-202

.”

The 2011 amendments. —

The first
2011 amendment, by ch. 176, § 1, substituted “29-2-113” for “29-2-109” in (a)(vi)(A).

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 196, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(i) through (a)(iii) and in the introductory language of (a)(vi), substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “seven thousand dollars ($7,000.00).”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added (e).

Suit against nonresident. —

District court had subject matter jurisdiction to consider an action seeking judgment on a promissory note where the fact that the note was made in another state or was secured by collateral located in another state had no impact on such jurisdiction, and although the note originally was secured by a second deed of trust in Idaho property, that deed of trust had been extinguished by foreclosure and was not part of the seller’s Wyoming case against the purchasers, thus, title to real estate would not be effected. Woodie v. Whitesell, 2019 WY 115, 451 P.3d 1152,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2019).

Suit for under $50,000. —

Circuit court
had jurisdiction independent of the declaratory relief sought, because
the amount of relief sought was less than $50,000, and thus, it had
jurisdiction to decide the declaratory judgment claim. Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133, 357 P.3d 1149,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2015).

Sum claimed will control unless

it appears that it is not made in good faith. Joslyn v. Professional Realty, 622 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1981).

Civil forfeiture proceedings. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

5-9-128

does not grant circuit courts jurisdiction over civil forfeiture proceedings, and district courts therefore have general jurisdiction over the proceedings. Orosco v. Wyoming (In re United States Currency Totaling $14,245.00), 2022 WY 15, 503 P.3d 51,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2022).

No aggregation of class action claims. —

In a class action lawsuit, the claim of each and every plaintiff, whether named or unnamed, must meet the minimum jurisdictional limit, and aggregation of claims for that purpose is not permitted. Mutual of Omaha Ins. Co. v. Blury-Losolla, 952 P.2d 1117,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998).

Proof required to determine lack of good faith in amount claimed. —

To determine that there is a lack of good faith in the amount claimed, it must appear to a legal certainty that the claim is really for less than the jurisdictional limit. Joslyn v. Professional Realty, 622 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1981).

Forcible entry and detainer. —

The $ 7,000.00 monetary jurisdictional limit that is set forth with respect to county courts applies only in those subparagraphs articulating jurisdiction in which the legislature specifically reiterated the amount; thus, the county court had jurisdiction in a forcible entry and detainer action in which the amount of rent due exceeded $ 7,000.00. Jessen v. Burry, 13 P.3d 1118,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 2000) (decided under prior law).

Suit for collection of back child support

was properly within the jurisdiction of the district court, even though the amount claimed was less than $7,000, where the plaintiff requested the court to grant her specific performance of all the terms in a separation agreement and her complaint raised issues of child custody under § 20-5-104.Daulton v. Daulton, 774 P.2d 635,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1989).

Suit against nonresident. —

Circuit court had subject matter jurisdiction over insurer's suit seeking to recover damages from nonresidents of Wyoming, not exceeding $7,000, arising from alleged negligent operation of a motor vehicle because circuit courts'
subject matter jurisdiction was governed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

5-9-128

, as the granting in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-6-301(c) of jurisdiction to district court of the county in which a cause of action arose or district court of the county in which plaintiff resided addressed venue rather than subject matter jurisdiction.
State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Kunz, 2008 WY 71, 186 P.3d 378,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2008).

Suit by hospital against personal representative of estate

to recover $2,133.87, following the rejection of its claim, was in the exclusive jurisdiction of the county court, as provided in this section, and not within the probate jurisdiction of the district court, pursuant to §

2-2-101

.Ivinson Memorial Hosp. v. Swindler, 828 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Merrill v. Jansma, 2004 WY 26, 86 P.3d 270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(2004);; Elec. Wholesale Supply Co. v. Fraser, 2015 WY 105,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Aug. 14, 2015).

Granite Springs Retreat Ass'n v. Manning, 2006 WY 60, 133 P.3d 1005,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. May 12, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 5-9-129.
Criminal jurisdiction.

Circuit courts have original
jurisdiction in all misdemeanor criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.35; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1989, ch. 39, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-133

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to jurisdiction of violations of city or town ordinances, see §

5-9-105

.

Subject matter jurisdiction determined from the face of the
charging documents. —

Where the charging documents alleged that offense was defendant's third family violence offense, making the offense a felony and bringing into play the enhancement provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(f)(ii), applying the rule that subject matter jurisdiction is determined from the face of the charging documents, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction over the felony offense because the charging documents alleged elements constituting a felony. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

Balderson v. State, 2013 WY 107, 309 P.3d 809,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Sept 17, 2013).

Cited

in

Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996); Circuit Court of the Eighth Judicial Dist. v. Lee Newspapers, 2014 WY 101,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 117

, 2014 WL 3908002 (Aug 12, 2014).

§ 5-9-130.
Concurrent jurisdiction.

For purposes of assignment,
all circuit court judges throughout the state shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with all district court judges throughout the state.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 1.

§ 5-9-131.
Assignment to district court judge.

A circuit court judge may assign to a district court judge any case or proceeding within the jurisdiction of the circuit court subject only to the following restrictions:

Rules promulgated by the supreme court; and

Acceptance of the judge to whom the assignment of the case or proceeding is to be made.

The law and rules governing circuit court and appeals therefrom shall apply to a case or proceeding assigned pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 1.

§ 5-9-132.
Authority to set bail; preliminary examinations.

Judges and magistrates of the circuit court are authorized to set bail before trial in accordance with this subsection and with the rules of the Wyoming supreme court. Judges and magistrates of the circuit court shall have the power and the duty to decide promptly the bail application of any person arrested for a violation of state law within the county, whether or not the formal document charging the person with a violation of state law has been filed with the court.

Preliminary examinations for persons charged with a felony shall be conducted by the circuit court judge or magistrate.

Preliminary examinations of persons charged with a misdemeanor shall not be conducted for a determination of probable cause.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.36; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1980, ch. 71, § 1; 1991, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-134

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Subject matter jurisdiction determined from the face of the
charging documents. —

Where the charging documents alleged that offense was defendant's third family violence offense, making the offense a felony and bringing into play the enhancement provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(f)(ii), applying the rule that subject matter jurisdiction is determined from the face of the charging documents, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction over the felony offense because the charging documents alleged elements constituting a felony. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited in

Circuit Court of the Eighth Judicial Dist. v. Lee Newspapers, 2014 WY 101,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 117

, 2014 WL 3908002 (Aug 12, 2014).

Quoted

in

Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Jan. 14, 2008).

§ 5-9-133.
Powers generally.

A circuit court may:

Preserve and enforce order in its immediate presence and in the proceedings before it according to the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for Circuit Courts and punish for contempt as provided therein;

Compel obedience to its judgments, orders, and processes;

Control, in furtherance of justice, the conduct of its ministerial officers, and of all other persons in any manner connected with judicial proceedings before it, in every matter pertaining thereto;

Issue warrants, including search warrants, summonses, subpoenas or other process in civil and criminal cases;

Administer oaths and affirmations and take bail, acknowledgments, affidavits, and depositions;

Amend and control its process and orders to make them conformable to law and justice;

Proceed to trial, render judgment, and grant writs of execution to carry into effect any order or judgment of the court;

Perform marriage ceremonies.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.37; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1983, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-135

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to solemnization of marriages, see §

20-1-106

.

As to acknowledgment of deeds and mortgages, and form thereof, see §§

34-1-113

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

For article, Sean Michael Larson, “Land And Water Law Division: Article: Warranting Legislative Action: The Search For Wyoming Court Authority To Issue Extraterritorial Search Warrants For Electronically Stored Information”, see
16 Wyo. L. Rev. 199 (2016).